Utah statutes.
58-69-802.   Practice within limits of law, education, training, experience, and competency.

Each individual licensed under this chapter shall confine his practice to those acts or practices:

(1)  permitted by law; and

(2)  in which the individual is competent by education, training, and experience.



Enacted by Chapter 116, 1996 General Session

